California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The final surveys, plans, specifications, and detailed drawings shall include a final estimate of cost. If the final estimate exceeds by more than 10 per cent the estimate named in the preliminary report of the district engineer, the final surveys, plans, specifications, and detailed drawings shall not be approved by the board of directors until the increase in estimated costs is approved by the board of supervisors of each county comprising the district, and by the Director of Transportation if any contribution is to be made by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

25233.

Upon the adoption of the final surveys, plans, specifications, and detailed drawings by the board of directors, a certified copy thereof shall be transmitted to the Director of Transportation for his approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

25261.

During the course of the improvement of any highway, the highway or project shall be under the control of the board of directors. The board of directors may adopt necessary regulations, not in conflict with law, concerning the use of the highway. During that period, the board may exclude from the highway any vehicular or other traffic which, in the opinion of the board of directors, may be detrimental to the public safety or will result in injury to the roadway during the progress of the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 172.)
-------------------------------------------

25262.

All laws relating to the use of state highways are applicable to any highways under the control of any district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 173.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Acquisition of Property and Rights of Way [25280. - 25281.]

25280.

The board of directors of the district may request the board of supervisors and the proper officers of any county situated within the district to condemn and acquire property or rights-of-way within that county which are necessary for the projects of the district. Upon receipt of the request, the board of supervisors shall undertake the condemnation and acquisition requested by the board of directors and the cost thereof shall be a proper deduction from any levy made by the district upon or within that county. Any excess in such cost over and above the amount of any such levy shall be paid to the county by the district out of any funds provided for that purpose. The proceedings required to be taken by any county or county officers under the provisions of this section may include the taking of possession prior to judgment of any property or rights-of-way necessary for district purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

25281.

If it is decided that any money authorized to be expended from the State Treasury shall be expended as required by Section 7 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the Director of Transportation shall have the exclusive management and control of the expenditure, if the boards of supervisors of the several counties concerned assent to the relinquishment and transfer of such management and control. However, the Director of Transportation may delegate his powers to the board of directors of the district. The board of directors of the district may vest, in the Director of Transportation, authority to supervise all or part of the work of improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 118.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Cooperation with Federal Government [25300. - 25300.]

25300.

If the Federal Government desires to include any highway improved or to be improved by a district in any scheme of National defense and to use or assume the use of the highway for military or other purposes, the board of directors of the district, either directly or through the proper board or officers of the State, may enter into negotiations respecting the highway and may enter into such contracts or agreements in relation thereto as are mutually satisfactory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Completion of Projects [25320. - 25322.]

25320.

Upon the completion of the improvement of any portion of any highway by the district, the board of directors may, and on the completion of the whole of any highway by the district, the board of directors shall, adopt a resolution declaring such completion and transmit a copy of the resolution to the board of supervisors of the county or counties in which the completed improvement is situated.

If the completed improvement, or any portion thereof, is situated within a city, a copy of the resolution shall likewise be transmitted to the governing body of the city and, if it is a state highway, a copy of the resolution shall also be transmitted to the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

25321.

Control of such completed improvement shall vest in the State, county or city having jurisdiction of the class of highways of which such completed improvement is a part upon receipt of the resolution of completion by the appropriate public officer or governing body thereof designated in the preceding section and the State, county or city, as the case may be, shall thereupon be liable for the future maintenance and care thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1141.)
-------------------------------------------

25322.

The board of directors shall not adopt any resolution of completion until it obtains from the Director of Transportation a certificate in writing showing that the highway, or portion thereof, proposed to be surrendered to the county within which it is situated has been improved in accordance with the plans and specifications previously adopted therefor. Unless the highway, or portion thereof, has been improved under his supervision, the Director of Transportation shall not be required to furnish the certificate until the district engineer delivers his certificate to the Director of Transportation showing that the highway, or portion thereof, has been improved in accordance with the plans and specifications previously adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 120.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. General Financing and County Levies [25340. - 25350.]

25340.

All moneys of the district applicable to the payment of improvement costs shall be placed in a fund designated “construction fund,” the moneys in which shall be disbursed by the treasurer of the district as ordered by the board of directors. This fund may be used to pay all improvement costs, all necessary engineering, legal and other operating costs of the district, including salaries of officers, agents and employees, and for the payment of the cost of the purchase and acquisition of all necessary property and rights of way required for any district project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25341.

The board of directors of the district shall provide for the financing of any projects to be undertaken by the district in one or more of the methods prescribed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25342.

Upon the award of a contract for the improvement of any project or unit thereof, the board of directors shall provide for the payment of the cost thereof unless such provision has been made prior to the award of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25343.

A levy shall be made within and upon the several counties composing the district to provide for the payment of the costs and expenses of any acquisitions of property or rights of way, or improvement undertaken by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25344.

The board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth in general terms the amount of money proposed to be raised by the levy and the project or portion thereof which is to be financed by the proposed levy. The proposed amount may be the total estimated amount payable under any contract awarded for improvement, or for any portion thereof, or for any excess of cost over the amount of any past levies already made for that purpose. There shall first be deducted from the amount of the levy any amount to be contributed thereto by the State and the balance of the levy shall be distributed among the several counties composing the district in the proportions set forth in the report of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25345.

The resolution shall specifically set forth the sum of money levied upon each county within the district and shall briefly recite the facts requiring the levy. After the adoption of the resolution a certified copy of the same shall be forthwith transmitted to the clerks of the several boards of supervisors of the counties composing the district. The counties shall then be obligated to pay the amount of the levy unless other provisions for financing are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25346.

The board of supervisors of each county shall, within 90 days after the resolution providing for the levy has been adopted by the board of directors, pay at least one-fifth of the total amount levied upon that county into the treasury of the district. The board of supervisors of each county is hereby authorized to and obligated to make such payment and may make payment of the entire amount of the levy made but not less than one-fifth of the total thereof. For the purpose of making the payment the board of supervisors of each county may utilize any funds of the county not otherwise allocated or appropriated, including any money received by the county from the State as the result of any tax or license upon motor vehicles or motor vehicle fuels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25347.

If the board of supervisors of any county within the district does not pay the entire amount of any levy made upon it within 90 days, the board of directors of the district shall provide for financing the balance in not to exceed four additional annual installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25348.

The treasurer of the district shall, prior to the fifteenth day of August in each year, transmit to the board of supervisors of each county within the district a statement of the total sum to be collected within that county during the fiscal year in behalf of the district. It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors of each county in the district, and of the other proper fiscal officers thereof, to cause the amount so certified by the district treasurer to be collected from the taxable property within the county and the total amount of such collections shall be transmitted to and deposited with the district treasurer not later than the first day of each month following the date of their collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25349.

If, upon receiving the report of the district treasurer showing the amount to be raised within the county for the current year, the board of supervisors pays that amount out of any moneys of the county available for that purpose, no levy of district taxes within that county need be made for the year covered by that payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25350.

All district taxes shall be collected in behalf of the district by the proper county officers in the several counties in the district at the same time and in the same form and manner as county taxes, and district taxes shall become due and payable in the same time and manner as county taxes are due and payable and shall become delinquent at the same times and in the same proportionate amounts and bear the same proportionate penalties and interest after delinquency as do county taxes, and, unless expressly provided to the contrary, all laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of county taxes are hereby made applicable to district taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15.5. Claims [25360. - 25360.]

25360.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. General Bond Provisions [25370. - 25377.]

25370.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all bonds issued under the authority of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25371.

All bonds issued by joint highway districts shall be legal investments for the funds of:

(a) Trusts.

(b) Insurance companies.

(c) Banks, both commercial and savings.

(d) Trust companies.

(e) State schools.

(f) Any other body whose funds may be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts or irrigation districts within the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25372.

Whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts or irrigation districts may be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, any bonds issued by joint highway districts may be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25373.

The State Director of Finance may purchase any bonds issued by joint highway districts and pay for them out of any surplus money in the State treasury which, in his judgment, is not required for governmental purposes prior to the maturity of such bonds. The boards of supervisors of the several counties within the district may likewise purchase such bonds with any surplus funds under their control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25374.

If the report of the board of directors shows that the proposed project or any unit thereof, is estimated to cost more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), the board of directors may provide that any bonds issued to finance the same shall be extended over a period of not to exceed 15 annual installments, in which event the initial payment from each county within the district shall be not less than the sum obtained by dividing the total amount payable in each county by the number of installments in which the bonds are to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25375.

The issuance of any bonds by the district shall be conclusive evidence of the regularity, validity and legal sufficiency of all proceedings, acts and determinations in any wise pertaining thereto. After the bonds are issued no assessment tax or tax or other charge levied or collected for the purpose of paying the principal or interest thereon shall be held to be invalid or illegal or set aside or refunded, by reason of any error, informality, irregularity, omission or defect in any of the proceedings, acts or determinations in any wise pertaining to the issuance or payment of the bonds. No action or proceeding shall be thereafter commenced or maintained to cancel or set aside the bonds or to prevent the payment thereof or the levy, collection or enforcement of any assessment tax, tax or other charge made for such payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25376.

No bonds shall be issued by the district in an amount which will aggregate at any time an obligation in excess of 10 per cent of the assessed value of the aggregate total taxable property within the district as shown by the then current taxation assessment rolls of the several counties within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25377.

The taxable property within any county shall not at any time be obligated for all joint highway district purposes, in any amount in excess of the following limitations:

(a) In counties having a total assessed value of all taxable property therein of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or less, not more than 3 per cent thereof.

(b) In counties having a total assessed value of all taxable property therein of more than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), not more than 2 per cent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Revenue Bonds [25400. - 25410.]

25400.

The board of directors of the district may cause revenue bonds to be issued upon the security of the anticipated unpaid installments of any levies made upon the counties within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.

All revenue bonds shall be payable out of a fund of the district designated “Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California Revenue Bond Fund” and into which shall be paid all sums necessary for the retirement of any revenue bonds which may be issued by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.

The board of directors shall prescribe the denominations of the revenue bonds which shall mature serially in convenient amounts not necessarily equal. Revenue bonds shall bear such rate of interest not to exceed 8 percent per annum as may be determined by the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.

Revenue bonds shall be in substantially the following form (filling in blanks as appropriate):REVENUE BONDJoint Highway District No.______ of the State of California$_______ Bond No. _______ Series________.Under and by virtue of Part 1 of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, the treasurer of Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California will pay to the bearer, out of the fund hereinafter designated, at the office of the treasurer of said district, on the ____ day of ____, 20__, the sum of ____ dollars, in lawful money of the United States of America, with interest thereon in like lawful money at the rate of ____ per cent per annum, payable semiannually on the second day of January and the second day of July of each year from the date hereof (except the last installment thereof, which shall be payable at the maturity of this bond), upon presentation and surrender, as they respectively become due, of the proper interest coupons hereto attached, the first of which is for interest from date hereof to the next date of interest payment, and the
 last for interest to maturity hereof from the last preceding date of interest payment. This bond is issued under and in conformity with the provisions of the above mentioned Part 1 of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, relative to the issuance of revenue bonds and is a primary obligation of the joint highway district above named.

This bond is payable out of the “Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California Revenue Bond Fund,” in accordance with the provisions of the said Part 1 of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code.

It is hereby certified, recited and declared that all proceedings, acts and things required by law precedent to or in the issuance of this bond have been regularly had, done and performed, and this bond is by law made conclusive evidence thereof.

In witness whereof the board of directors of said joint highway district has caused this bond to be signed by the treasurer of said district, attested by the secretary of said board, and the official seal of said district to be affixed hereto, this ____ day of ____, 20__.(seal)Treasurer of Joint Highway DistrictNo. _____ of the State of CaliforniaAttest:Secretary of the Board of Directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 16.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25404.

Revenue bonds shall be dated as of the date of the resolution or order of the board of directors authorizing their issuance. The board of directors may use any available moneys of the district, not already allocated to some other purpose, for the payment of any interest or principal due or past due on any revenue bonds of the district, and may advance moneys of the district for such purposes and in the event of such advancement shall be entitled to reimbursement in the amount thereof out of any levies thereafter made or any moneys thereafter collected and applicable to the payment of such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25405.

Any number of series of revenue bonds may be issued under this part for any portion of a single or different projects in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25406.

All revenue bonds shall be signed by the treasurer of the district, attested by the secretary of the board of directors thereof and shall have the official seal of the district attached thereto. The form of the interest coupons attached to the bonds shall be determined by the treasurer subject to the approval of the board of directors. The signature on the interest coupons shall be that of the treasurer and may be either written or engraved or printed facsimile.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25407.

The principal and interest of all revenue bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at the office of the treasurer of the district issuing the same. Revenue bonds shall be serial in character and an approximately even proportion of the total amount of each issue shall be payable annually. The amount of the principal due in each annual payment excepting the last may be made to differ not more than five hundred dollars ($500) from the amount obtained by dividing the total of the principal amount due under the bonds, by the number of installments which shall not exceed four. The last installment shall be for the balance of the total principal amount
 not provided to be paid in the previous installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25408.

The revenue bonds shall be issued and sold by the board of directors at such times and manner and in such amounts as may be required to meet the demands of the district as may be determined by the board of directors or they may be delivered to any contractor performing any work for the district, at par, in satisfaction of any sum due upon his contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25409.

The board of directors shall levy a tax annually within the district sufficient to meet the principal and interest of all outstanding revenue bonds coming due in each fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25410.

The treasurer of the district shall annually determine the amount of money necessary to be raised for the payment of principal and interest coming due each fiscal year upon any outstanding revenue bonds. The treasurer shall add to that amount a sum sufficient, in his judgment, to cover anticipated delinquencies and the resulting sum shall be levied upon all of the property taxable for county purposes, in the several counties composing the district, according to the percentages and proportions established for each county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Funding Bonds [25430. - 25450.]

25430.

As a separate and cumulative method of financing, the board of directors of the district may issue funding bonds to cover the costs and expenses of the whole or any part of any acquisitions of property and improvements undertaken by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25431.

The provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of funding bonds shall be cumulative and shall not affect any of the other provisions or sections of this part relative to other bonds or levies. Any number of series of funding bonds may be issued for any portion or portions of a single or different projects of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25432.

If the board of directors propose to issue funding bonds, they shall first adopt a resolution setting forth their intention so to do, and the resolution shall also contain the following:

(a) A general description of the boundaries of the funding district to be charged with the payment of any funding bonds which are proposed to be issued. The funding district may embrace the whole or any portion of the joint highway district, and the funding district shall be divided into zones composed of the counties, or portions thereof, composing the joint highway district. It shall be a sufficient description of the boundaries
 of the funding district and the zones therein, if the same are clearly shown upon a map or plat attached to the resolution.

(b) A description in general terms of the location, character and cost of the acquisition of property or improvement for which it is proposed to issue the funding bonds.

(c) A statement of the proposed amount for which funding bonds are to be issued, together with a statement of the maximum time for which such bonds are proposed to be issued (which shall not exceed five years from the date of the order providing for their issuance), and the rate of interest which such bonds shall bear, not to exceed 6 per cent per annum.

(d) A statement of the percentage of the total amount of the annual sums to be levied upon the lands, exclusive of improvements, within each zone in the funding district for the
 purpose of retiring the principal and interest of the funding bonds. The amount to be thus levied shall not exceed the proportionate amounts chargeable against the several counties within the district as set forth in the report of the board of directors adopted pursuant to Section 25154.

(e) A statement of the time and place fixed for the hearing upon the matter of the proposed issuance of funding bonds, in the manner provided for in this resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25433.

Upon the adoption of the resolution of intention to issue funding bonds, the secretary shall cause a notice of the time and place of hearing to be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation published at the county seat of each county embraced within the boundaries of the proposed funding district. The newspapers in which such publication shall be made may be designated by the board of directors or, if the board does not make the designation, the secretary may do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25434.

The time fixed for the hearing shall not be less than 15 days after the completion of the required publication. Not less than 30 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing, a copy of the notice of the hearing shall be transmitted by the secretary of the board of directors to the several boards of supervisors of the counties comprising the district. No county or portion of a county shall be assessed within any funding district for the payment of any amount which has previously been paid by such county into the district treasury upon any amount previously levied within and upon such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25435.

All persons interested may appear at the hearing and they may set forth in writing any objections they may have to the issuance of the funding bonds or to the boundaries of the proposed funding district or the zones therein, or to the amount of benefits to be derived by any parcel of land within the proposed funding district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25436.

The board of directors shall hear and determine all objections presented at the hearing. The board may alter the boundaries of the proposed funding district or change the amount for which funding bonds are proposed to be issued, but it may not enlarge the boundaries of the funding district or increase the amount of bonds proposed to be issued. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board of directors shall finally determine the boundaries of the funding district and the zones therein and shall determine the amount of funding bonds to be issued, and the proportions of the bonds to be charged against each zone, which amounts shall not exceed the benefits to be derived by the lands
 within the funding district from the project for which the funding bonds are to be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25437.

All decisions, findings and determinations of the board of directors made upon notice and hearing shall, in the absence of actual fraud, be final and conclusive upon all persons entitled to present objections at such hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25438.

If at the hearing, the owners of more than 25 per cent in area of the property within any proposed funding district object in writing to the issuance of funding bonds, the board of directors shall have no power to cause such funding bonds to issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25439.

Following the hearing the board of directors shall, if it determines to issue funding bonds, cause its findings in relation thereto to be transmitted to the boards of supervisors of the several counties within the district. If any board of supervisors makes objection to the issuance of the funding bonds within 35 days after receiving notice thereof, the board of directors shall have no power to cause the same to be issued, but may take new proceedings in the same manner as provided in the first instance covering an amended proposition for the issuance of funding bonds for the same or any different project or any portions thereof. If no objections are made by any board of
 supervisors as in this section provided, the board of directors may proceed to issue the funding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25440.

Funding bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be in substantially the following form (filling in blanks as appropriate):
FUNDING BOND
Joint Highway District No. ___ of the State of California

$____ Bond No. ___ Serial ___.

Under and by virtue of Part 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, the treasurer of Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California will pay to the bearer, out of the fund hereinafter designated, at the office of the treasurer of said district, on the ____ day of ____, 20__, the sum of ____ dollars, in lawful money of the United States of America, with interest thereon in like lawful money at the rate of ____ per cent per annum, payable semiannually on the second day of January and the second day of July in each year from the date hereof (except the last installment thereof, which shall be payable at the maturity of this bond), upon presentation and surrender, as they respectively become due, of the proper interest coupons hereto attached, the first of which is for interest from date hereof to the next date of interest
 payment, and the last for interest to maturity hereof from the last preceding date of interest payment. This bond is issued under and in conformity with the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code, and is one of a series of bonds of like date and effect numbered from one to ____ consecutively. It is hereby certified, recited, and declared that all proceedings, acts, and things required by law precedent to or in the issuance of this bond have been regularly had, done, and performed, and this bond is by law made conclusive evidence thereof.

This bond is payable out of the “Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California Funding Bond Redemption Fund,” exclusively, as the same appears upon the books of the treasurer of that district, and in accordance with the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Division 16 of the Streets and Highways Code special assessment taxes will be levied
 and collected upon the lands within Funding District No. ____ in that joint highway district in an amount clearly sufficient to pay the principal and interest of the bonds as the bonds become due and payable.

In witness whereof the board of directors of the district has caused this bond to be signed by the treasurer of the district attested by the secretary of the board and the official seal of the district to be affixed hereto this ____ day of ____, 20__. (SEAL)Treasurer of Joint Highway DistrictNo. ___ of the State of California.Attest: Secretary of the Board of Directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 210.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

25441.

Funding bonds shall be dated as of the date of the resolution or order of the board of directors authorizing their issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25442.

The board of directors may use any available moneys of the district, not already allocated to some other purpose, for the payment of any interest or principal due or past due upon any funding bonds of the district, and may advance moneys of the district for that purpose. If an advancement is made the district shall be entitled to reimbursement out of any levies thereafter made or any moneys thereafter collected and applicable to the payment of the funding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25443.

All funding bonds shall be signed by the treasurer of the district, attested by the secretary, and shall have the official seal of the district affixed thereto. The form of the interest coupons attached to the funding bonds shall be determined by the treasurer subject to the approval of the board of directors. The signature on the interest coupons shall be that of the treasurer and may be either written, or an engraved or printed facsimile. The principal and interest of the funding bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at the office of the treasurer of the district issuing the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25445.

All funding bonds shall be serial in character and approximately an even proportion of the total amount of each issue shall be payable annually. The amount of the principal due in each annual payment need not be exactly the same but with respect to each installment excepting the last may be made to differ not more than five hundred dollars ($500) from the amount obtained by dividing the total of the principal amount due under the bonds, by the number of installments. The last installment shall be for the balance of the total principal amount not provided to be paid in the previous installments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25446.

The funding bonds shall be issued by the board of directors at such time and manner and in such amounts as may be required to meet the demands of the district, as may be determined by the board of directors. The form, denomination, rate of interest, time, place and manner of payment and all matters relating to such issuance shall be determined by the board of directors, but the rate of interest shall not exceed 6 per cent per annum.

The funding bonds so issued may be sold in such amounts and at such times and in such manner as the board of directors may determine, or they may be delivered to any contractor performing any work for the
 district, at par, in satisfaction of any sum due upon his contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25447.

In each district in which funding bonds have been issued there is hereby created a special fund to be designated “Joint Highway District No. ____ of the State of California Funding Bond Redemption Fund No. ____” (each such fund to be consecutively numbered within each district as created) for the discharge and payment of principal and interest on such bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25448.

The treasurer of the district shall annually before the fifteenth day of August transmit to the several boards of supervisors within the funding district, a statement showing the amount to be raised in such year by the levy and collection of special assessment taxes upon the lands only, exclusive of improvements, within each county which is within the funding district and subject to be taxed for the payment of principal, interest and delinquencies upon any funding bonds of the district. The statement shall show the percentages of the total amount to be levied upon the lands in each county in accordance with the zones established for each such funding district. The engineer of
 the district shall cause to be prepared and filed in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county within the district, a map or plat showing the boundaries of the lands in each county which are within any funding district showing the boundaries of the zones therein and the percentage of the total assessment to be paid by each zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25449.

The special assessment taxes levied for the payment of funding bonds shall be independent of and distinct from any other levies authorized by this part and shall be levied, collected and enforced by the proper officers of the several counties within the district, in behalf of the joint highway district and in the same manner and by the same persons and at the same time and with the same penalties and interest as are taxes for county purposes, and all laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of taxes for county purposes are hereby made applicable to these special assessment taxes where such laws are not in conflict with the provisions of this part except that such
 special assessment taxes shall be levied and collected upon land only, exclusive of the improvements thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

25450.
